static/hunspell/03.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX U28 Y 645 # существительные Noun
SFX U28 ҡ ғом .	+PxSg1
SFX U28 ҡ ғоң .	+PxSg2
SFX U28 ҡ ғо .	+PxSg3
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙ .	+PxPl1
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙ .	+PxPl2
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоң .	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоң .	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноң .	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоң .	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоң .	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғома .	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңа .	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғона .	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙға .	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙға .	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдо .	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдо .	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғон .	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙо .	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙо .	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдан .	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдан .	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX U28 ҡ ғонан .	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙан .	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙан .	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX U28 ҡ ғомда .	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңда .	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғонда .	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙа .	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙа .	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоңмо .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоңмо .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноңмо .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоңмо .	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоңмо .	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомамы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңамы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғонамы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙғамы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙғамы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдомо .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдомо .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғонмо .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙомо .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙомо .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомданмы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңданмы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғонанмы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙанмы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙанмы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдамы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдамы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғондамы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙамы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙамы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоңмолор .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоңмолор .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноңмолор .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоңмолор .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоңмолор .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомамылыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңамылыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғонамылыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙғамылыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙғамылыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдомолор .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдомолор .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғонмолор .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙомолор .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙомолор .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомданмылыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңданмылыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғонанмылыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдамылыр .	+PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдамылыр .	+PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғондамылыр .	+PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоңдор .	+PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоңдор .	+PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноңдор .	+PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоңдор .	+PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоңдор .	+PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомалыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңалыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоналыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙғалыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙғалыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдолор .	+PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдолор .	+PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғондор .	+PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙолор .	+PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙолор .	+PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдандыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдандыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғонандыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙандыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙандыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдалыр .	+PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдалыр .	+PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғондалыр .	+PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙалыр .	+PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙалыр .	+PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоңсо .	+PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоңсо .	+PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноңсо .	+PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоңсо .	+PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоңсо .	+PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомасы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңасы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғонасы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙғасы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙғасы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдосо .	+PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдосо .	+PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғонсо .	+PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙосо .	+PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙосо .	+PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдансы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдансы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғонансы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙансы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙансы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдасы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдасы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғондасы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙасы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙасы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоммо .	+PxSg1+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңмо .	+PxSg2+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомо .	+PxSg3+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙмо .	+PxPl1+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙмо .	+PxPl2+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоммолор .	+PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңмолор .	+PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомолор .	+PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙмолор .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙмолор .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдор .	+PxSg1+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдор .	+PxSg2+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғолор .	+PxSg3+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙор .	+PxPl1+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙор .	+PxPl2+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомсо .	+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңсо .	+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғосо .	+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙсо .	+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙсо .	+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡо .	+PxSg1+Poss
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡо .	+PxSg2+Poss
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡо .	+PxSg3+Poss
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡо .	+PxPl1+Poss
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡо .	+PxPl2+Poss
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡоноң .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡоноң .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡоноң .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоноң .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоноң .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡона .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡона .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡона .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡона .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡона .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡон .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡон .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡон .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡон .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡон .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонан .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонан .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонан .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонан .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонан .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонда .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонда .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонда .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонда .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонда .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡоноңмо .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡоноңмо .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡоноңмо .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоноңмо .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоноңмо .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонамы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонамы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонамы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонамы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонамы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонмо .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонмо .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонмо .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонмо .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонмо .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонанмы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонанмы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонанмы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонанмы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонанмы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡондамы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡондамы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡондамы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡондамы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡондамы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡоноңдор .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡоноңдор .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡоноңдор .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоноңдор .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоноңдор .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡоналыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡоналыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡоналыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоналыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоналыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡондор .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡондор .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡондор .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡондор .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡондор .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонандыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонандыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонандыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонандыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонандыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡондалыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡондалыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡондалыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡондалыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡондалыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡоноңсо .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡоноңсо .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡоноңсо .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡоноңсо .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡоноңсо .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонасы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонасы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонасы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонасы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонасы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонсо .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонсо .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонсо .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонсо .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонсо .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡонансы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡонансы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡонансы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡонансы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡонансы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡондасы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡондасы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡондасы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡондасы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡондасы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡомо .	+PxSg1+Poss +Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡомо .	+PxSg2+Poss +Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡомо .	+PxSg3+Poss +Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡомо .	+PxPl1+Poss +Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡомо .	+PxPl2+Poss +Q
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡолор .	+PxSg1+Poss +Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡолор .	+PxSg2+Poss +Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡолор .	+PxSg3+Poss +Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡолор .	+PxPl1+Poss +Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡолор .	+PxPl2+Poss +Indf
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдоҡосо .	+PxSg1+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдоҡосо .	+PxSg2+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоноҡосо .	+PxSg3+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙоҡосо .	+PxPl1+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙоҡосо .	+PxPl2+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдай .	+PxSg1+Der/дай
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдай .	+PxSg2+Der/дай
SFX U28 ҡ ғолай .	+PxSg3+Der/дай
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙай .	+PxPl1+Der/дай
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙай .	+PxPl2+Der/дай
SFX U28 ҡ ғомса .	+PxSg1+Der/са
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңса .	+PxSg2+Der/са
SFX U28 ҡ ғоса .	+PxSg3+Der/са
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙса .	+PxPl1+Der/са
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙса .	+PxPl2+Der/са
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдайҙар .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдайҙар .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғолайҙар .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙайҙар .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙайҙар .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғомсалар .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңсалар .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғосалар .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙсалар .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙсалар .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдайҙар .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдайҙар .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғолайҙар .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙайҙар .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙайҙар .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдайҙарға .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдайҙарға .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғолайҙарға .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙайҙарға .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙайҙарға .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U28 ҡ ғомдайҙарҙы .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоңдайҙарҙы .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғолайҙарҙы .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғобоҙҙайҙарҙы .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U28 ҡ ғоғоҙҙайҙарҙы .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
